Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-859
Unit owners association; organization.

A unit owners association must be organized no later than the date the units in the condominium equal to one-half of the total number of units plus one are conveyed. The membership of the association at all times shall consist exclusively of all the unit owners or, following termination of the condominium, of all former unit owners entitled to distributions of proceeds under section 76-855 or their heirs, successors, or assigns. The association shall be organized as a profit or nonprofit corporation or as an unincorporated association.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 35;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 45.